District of Columbia statutes.
3-1308

Power to administer oaths and take testimony; subpoena power.

The Board, or any subcommittee thereof authorized to conduct any inquiry, investigation, or hearing pursuant to this chapter, shall have the power to administer oaths and take testimony under oath relative to the matter of inquiry or investigation. At any hearing ordered by the Board, the Board or subcommittee thereof, or such agent having authority by law to issue such process, may subpoena witnesses and require production of records, papers, and documents relevant to such inquiry. The refusal or failure to provide relevant testimony or produce relevant records, papers, and documents pursuant to the properly issued subpoena of the Board by any applicant before the Board or licensee or agent authorized by the Board, or any officer, director, or employee of such applicant, licensee, or agent, may subject such applicant to summary denial of its application and summary termination of license or authorization of such licensee or agent. If any person disobeys such process, or, having appeared in obedience thereto, refuses to answer any relevant or pertinent questions propounded by the Board or subcommittee thereof, the Board or subcommittee thereof may apply to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, or to any judge of said Court if the Court is not in session, setting forth such disobedience to process or refusal to answer, and said Court or judge shall cite such person to appear before said Court or judge to answer such questions or to produce such records and papers and, upon refusal to do so, shall take such punitive action, in accord with the appropriate provisions of the District of Columbia Code, as said Court or judge may deem necessary and appropriate. Notwithstanding the imposition of any such punitive action, the Board or subcommittee thereof may proceed with such inquiry or investigation as if the witness had not previously been called to testify.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
1981 Ed., § 2-2508.